Tennessee, session 114, SB0082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (36).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-252(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Standards committee, department of human services, created by § 71-3-511;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0082
000341
- 1 -